Utah statutes.
48-2a-103.5.   Limited partnership name -- Limited rights.
The authorization to file a certificate under or to reserve or register a
limited partnership name as granted by the division does not:
(1)  abrogate or limit the law governing unfair competition or unfair trade
practices;
(2)  derogate from the common law, the principles of equity, or the statutes
of this state or of the United States with respect to the right to acquire and
protect names and trademarks; or
(3)  create an exclusive right in geographic or generic terms contained within
a name.
